District of Columbia statutes.
28-2906

Nonliability of corporation and transfer agent.

A corporation or transfer agent does not incur liability to any person by making a transfer or otherwise acting in a manner authorized by this chapter.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 674, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 6 of the Uniform Act for Simplification of Fiduciary Security Transfers.
1973 Ed., § 28-2906.
1981 Ed., § 28-2906.